Nevada, session 83, AB175.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 483.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
483.460 1. Except as otherwise provided by specific statute,
the Department shall revoke the license, permit or privilege of any
driver upon receiving a record of his or her conviction of any of the
following offenses, when that conviction has become final, and the
driver is not eligible for a license, permit or privilege to drive for
the period indicated:
-
*AB175*

– 2 –
(a) For a period of 185 days, if the offense is a first violation
within [7] 10 years of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120.
(b) For a period of 1 year if the offense is:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), any
manslaughter, including vehicular manslaughter as described in
NRS 484B.657, resulting from the driving of a motor vehicle or
felony in the commission of which a motor vehicle is used,
including the unlawful taking of a motor vehicle.
(2) Failure to stop and render aid as required pursuant to the
laws of this State in the event of a motor vehicle crash resulting in
the death or bodily injury of another.
(3) Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or statement
under oath to the Department pursuant to NRS 483.010 to 483.630,
inclusive, or pursuant to any other law relating to the ownership or
driving of motor vehicles.
(4) Conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated, upon three
charges of reckless driving committed within a period of 12 months.
(5) A second violation within [7] 10 years of NRS 484C.110
or 484C.120.
(6) A violation of NRS 484B.550.
(c) For a period of 3 years if the offense is:
(1) A first violation of driving without an ignition interlock
device or tampering with an ignition interlock device pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 484C.470 and the driver is not eligible for a
restricted license or an ignition interlock privilege during any of that
period.
(2) A violation of subsection 9 of NRS 484B.653.
(3) A third or subsequent violation within [7] 10 years of
NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120.
(4) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 resulting in a
felony conviction pursuant to NRS 484C.400 or 484C.410.
(5) A violation of NRS 484C.430 or a homicide resulting
from driving or being in actual physical control of a vehicle while
under the influence of intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance
or resulting from any other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110,
484C.130 or 484C.430.
 The period during which such a driver is not eligible for a
license, permit or privilege to drive must be set aside during any
period of imprisonment and the period of revocation must resume
when the Department is notified pursuant to NRS 209.517 or
213.12185 that the person has completed the period of
imprisonment or that the person has been placed on residential
confinement or parole.
(d) For a period of 5 years if the offense is a second or
subsequent violation of driving without an ignition interlock device
-
*AB175*

– 3 –
or tampering with an ignition interlock device pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 484C.470 and the driver is not eligible for a
restricted license or an ignition interlock privilege during any of that
period.
2. The Department shall revoke the license, permit or privilege
of a driver convicted of violating NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 who
fails to complete the educational course on the use of alcohol and
controlled substances within the time ordered by the court and shall
add a period of 90 days during which the driver is not eligible for a
license, permit or privilege to drive.
3. When the Department is notified by a court that a person
who has been convicted of a first violation within [7] 10 years of
NRS 484C.110 has been permitted to enter a program of treatment
pursuant to NRS 484C.320, the Department shall reduce by one-half
the period during which the person is not eligible for a license,
permit or privilege to drive, but shall restore that reduction in time if
notified that the person was not accepted for or failed to complete
the treatment.
4. In addition to any other requirements set forth by specific
statute, if the Department is notified that a court has ordered the
revocation, suspension or delay in the issuance of a license pursuant
to title 5 of NRS, NRS 206.330 or 392.148, chapters 484A to 484E,
inclusive, of NRS or any other provision of law, the Department
shall take such actions as are necessary to carry out the court’s
order.
Sec. 2. NRS 484C.400 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.400 1. Unless a greater penalty is provided pursuant to
NRS 484C.430 or 484C.440, and except as otherwise provided in
NRS 484C.394 or 484C.410, a person who violates the provisions
of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120:
(a) For the first offense within [7] 10 years, is guilty of a
misdemeanor. Unless the person is allowed to undergo treatment as
provided in NRS 484C.320, the court shall:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (4) of this
paragraph or subsection 3 of NRS 484C.420, order the person to pay
tuition for an educational course on alcohol or other substance use
disorders approved by the Department and complete the course
within the time specified in the order, and the court shall notify the
Department if the person fails to complete the course within the
specified time;
(2) Unless the sentence is reduced pursuant to
NRS 484C.320:
(I) Sentence the person to imprisonment for not less than
2 days nor more than 6 months in jail or residential confinement for
-
*AB175*

– 4 –
not less than 2 days nor more than 6 months, in the manner provided
in NRS 4.376 to 4.3766, inclusive, or 5.0755 to 5.078, inclusive; or
(II) Order the person to perform not less than 48 hours,
but not more than 96 hours, of community service;
(3) Fine the person not less than $400 nor more than $1,000;
and
(4) If the person is found to have a concentration of alcohol
of 0.18 or more in his or her blood or breath, order the person to
attend a program of treatment for an alcohol or other substance use
disorder pursuant to the provisions of NRS 484C.360.
(b) For a second offense within [7] 10 years, is guilty of a
misdemeanor. Unless the sentence is reduced pursuant to NRS
484C.330, the court shall:
(1) Sentence the person to:
(I) Imprisonment for not less than 10 days nor more than
6 months in jail; or
(II) Residential confinement for not less than 10 days nor
more than 6 months, in the manner provided in NRS 4.376 to
4.3766, inclusive, or 5.0755 to 5.078, inclusive;
(2) Fine the person not less than $750 nor more than $1,000,
or order the person to perform an equivalent number of hours of
community service; and
(3) Order the person to attend a program of treatment for an
alcohol or other substance use disorder pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 484C.360.
 A person who willfully fails or refuses to complete successfully a
term of residential confinement or a program of treatment ordered
pursuant to this paragraph is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 484C.340, for a third
offense within [7] 10 years, is guilty of a category B felony and the
court:
(1) Shall:
(I) Sentence the person to imprisonment in the state
prison for a minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum
term of not more than 6 years; and
(II) Fine the person not less than $2,000 nor more than
$5,000; and
(2) May order the person to attend a program of treatment for
an alcohol or other substance use disorder pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 484C.360 if the results of an evaluation conducted pursuant
to NRS 484C.300 indicate that the person has an alcohol or other
substance use disorder and that the person can be treated
successfully for his or her condition.
 An offender who is imprisoned pursuant to the provisions of this
paragraph must, insofar as practicable, be segregated from offenders
-
*AB175*

– 5 –
whose crimes were violent and, insofar as practicable, be assigned
to an institution or facility of minimum security.
2. An offense that occurred within [7] 10 years immediately
preceding the date of the principal offense or after the principal
offense constitutes a prior offense for the purposes of this section:
(a) When evidenced by a conviction; or
(b) If the offense is conditionally dismissed or the judgment of
conviction is set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.240, 176A.260 or
176A.290 or dismissed in connection with successful completion of
a diversionary program or specialty court program,
 without regard to the sequence of the offenses and convictions.
The facts concerning a prior offense must be alleged in the
complaint, indictment or information, must not be read to the jury or
proved at trial but must be proved at the time of sentencing and, if
the principal offense is alleged to be a felony, must also be shown at
the preliminary examination or presented to the grand jury.
3. A term of confinement imposed pursuant to the provisions
of this section may be served intermittently at the discretion of the
judge or justice of the peace, except that a person who is convicted
of a second or subsequent offense within [7] 10 years must be
confined for at least one segment of not less than 48 consecutive
hours. This discretion must be exercised after considering all the
circumstances surrounding the offense, and the family and
employment of the offender, but any sentence of 30 days or less
must be served within 6 months after the date of conviction or, if the
offender was sentenced pursuant to NRS 484C.320 or 484C.330 and
the suspension of his or her sentence was revoked, within 6 months
after the date of revocation. Any time for which the offender is
confined must consist of not less than 24 consecutive hours.
4. Jail sentences simultaneously imposed pursuant to this
section and NRS 482.456, 483.560, 484C.410 or 485.330 must run
consecutively.
5. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less than
15 years of age in the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the
court shall consider that fact as an aggravating factor in determining
the sentence of the defendant.
6. For the purpose of determining whether one offense occurs
within [7] 10 years of another offense, any period of time between
the two offenses during which, for any such offense, the offender is
imprisoned, serving a term of residential confinement, placed under
the supervision of a treatment provider, on parole or on probation
must be excluded.
7. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 or 484C.430;
-
*AB175*

– 6 –
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130 or 484C.430;
or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).
Sec. 3. NRS 484C.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.410 1. Unless a greater penalty is provided in NRS
484C.440, a person who has previously been convicted of:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable
as a felony pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 484C.400;
(b) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
(c) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130 or 484C.430;
(d) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a), (b) or (c);
or
(e) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 that was
reduced from a felony pursuant to NRS 484C.340,
 and who violates the provisions of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 is
guilty of a category B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment
in the state prison for a minimum term of not less than 2 years and a
maximum term of not more than 15 years, and shall be further
punished by a fine of not less than $2,000 nor more than $5,000. An
offender so imprisoned must, insofar as practicable, be segregated
from offenders whose crimes were violent and, insofar as
practicable, be assigned to an institution or facility of minimum
security.
2. An offense which is listed in paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive,
of subsection 1 that occurred on any date preceding the date of the
principal offense or after the principal offense constitutes a prior
offense for the purposes of this section when evidenced by a
conviction, without regard for the sequence of the offenses and
convictions. The facts concerning a prior offense must be alleged in
the complaint, indictment or information, must not be read to the
jury or proved at trial but must be proved at the time of sentencing
and, if the principal offense is alleged to be a felony, must also be
shown at the preliminary examination or presented to the grand jury.
3. A term of confinement imposed pursuant to the provisions
of this section may be served intermittently at the discretion of the
-
*AB175*

– 7 –
judge or justice of the peace, except that a person who is convicted
of a second or subsequent offense within [7] 10 years must be
confined for at least one segment of not less than 48 consecutive
hours. This discretion must be exercised after considering all the
circumstances surrounding the offense, and the family and
employment of the offender, but any sentence of 30 days or less
must be served within 6 months after the date of conviction or, if the
offender was sentenced pursuant to NRS 484C.320 or 484C.330 and
the suspension of offender’s sentence was revoked, within 6 months
after the date of revocation. Any time for which the offender is
confined must consist of not less than 24 consecutive hours.
4. Jail sentences simultaneously imposed pursuant to this
section and NRS 482.456, 483.560, 484C.400 or 485.330 must run
consecutively.
5. If the defendant was transporting a person who is less than
15 years of age in the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, the
court shall consider that fact as an aggravating factor in determining
the sentence of the defendant.
6. For the purpose of determining whether one offense occurs
within [7] 10 years of another offense, any period of time between
the two offenses during which, for any such offense, the offender is
imprisoned, serving a term of residential confinement, placed under
the supervision of a treatment provider, on parole or on probation
must be excluded.
7. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, “offense” means:
(a) A violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 or 484C.430;
(b) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual
physical control of a vehicle while under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance or resulting from any
other conduct prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130 or 484C.430;
or
(c) A violation of a law of any other jurisdiction that prohibits
the same or similar conduct as set forth in paragraph (a) or (b).
Sec. 4. NRS 484C.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.460 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2
and 5, a court shall order a person to install, at his or her own
expense, an ignition interlock device in any motor vehicle which the
person operates as a condition to obtaining an ignition interlock
privilege pursuant to NRS 483.490 to reinstate the driving privilege
of the person:
(a) For a period of 185 days if the person is convicted of a first
violation within [7] 10 years of NRS 484C.110.
(b) For a period of 1 year if the person is convicted of a second
violation within [7] 10 years of NRS 484C.110.
-
*AB175*

– 8 –
(c) For a period of 3 years if the person is convicted of:
(1) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is
punishable as a felony pursuant to NRS 484C.400 or 484C.410; or
(2) A violation of NRS 484C.130 or 484C.430.
2. A court may provide for an exception to the provisions of
subsection 1 for a person who is convicted of a violation of NRS
484C.110 that is punishable pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of NRS 484C.400, if the court determines that:
(a) The person is unable to provide a deep lung breath sample
for analysis by an ignition interlock device, as certified in writing by
a physician or an advanced practice registered nurse of the person;
or
(b) The person resides more than 100 miles from a manufacturer
of an ignition interlock device or its agent.
3. If the court orders a person to install an ignition interlock
device pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) The court shall immediately prepare and transmit a copy of
its order to the Director. The order must include a statement that an
ignition interlock device is required and the specific period for
which it is required. The Director shall cause this information to be
incorporated into the records of the Department and noted on the
person’s ignition interlock privilege.
(b) The person who is required to install the ignition interlock
device shall provide proof of compliance to the Department before
the person may receive an ignition interlock privilege. Each model
of an ignition interlock device installed pursuant to this section must
have been certified by the Department of Public Safety.
4. A person who obtains an ignition interlock privilege
pursuant to this section or NRS 483.490 shall have the ignition
interlock device inspected, calibrated, monitored and maintained by
the manufacturer of the ignition interlock device or its agent at least
one time each 90 days during the period in which the person is
required to use the ignition interlock device to determine whether
the ignition interlock device is operating properly. Any inspection,
calibration, monitoring or maintenance required pursuant to this
subsection must be conducted in accordance with regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 484C.480. The manufacturer or its agent
shall submit a report to the Director of the Department of Public
Safety indicating whether any of the incidents listed in subsection 1
of NRS 484C.470 have occurred and whether the ignition interlock
device has been tampered with. Before the court imposes a penalty
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 484C.470, the court shall afford
any interested party an opportunity for a hearing after reasonable
notice.
-
*AB175*

– 9 –
5. If a person is required to operate a motor vehicle in the
course and scope of his or her employment and the motor vehicle is
owned by the person’s employer, the person may operate that
vehicle without the installation of an ignition interlock device, if:
(a) The employee notifies his or her employer that the employee
has been issued an ignition interlock privilege; and
(b) The employee has proof of that notification in his or her
possession or the notice, or a facsimile copy thereof, is with the
motor vehicle.
 This exemption does not apply to a motor vehicle owned by a
business which is all or partly owned or controlled by the person
otherwise subject to this section.
6. The running of the period during which a person is required
to have an ignition interlock device installed pursuant to this section
commences when the Department issues an ignition interlock
privilege to the person and is tolled whenever and for as long as the
person is, with regard to a violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120,
484C.130 or 484C.430, imprisoned, serving a term of residential
confinement, placed under the supervision of a treatment provider,
on parole or on probation.
Sec. 5. NRS 484C.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484C.520 1. If a person is convicted of a second or
subsequent violation of NRS 484C.110, 484C.120 or 484C.430
within [7] 10 years or a violation of NRS 484C.130, the court shall
issue an order directing the Department to suspend the registration
of each motor vehicle that is registered to or owned by the person
for 5 days.
2. If a court issues an order directing the Department to
suspend the registration of a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection 1,
the court shall forward a copy of the order to the Department within
5 days after issuing the order. The order must include, without
limitation, information concerning each motor vehicle that is
registered to or owned by the person, including, without limitation,
the registration number of the motor vehicle, if such information is
available.
3. A court shall provide for limited exceptions to the provisions
of subsection 1 on an individual basis to avoid undue hardship to a
person other than the person to whom that provision applies. Such
an exception must be provided if the court determines that:
(a) A member of the immediate family of the person whose
registration is suspended needs to use the motor vehicle:
(1) To travel to or from work or in the course and scope of
his or her employment;
-
*AB175*

– 10 –
(2) To obtain medicine, food or other necessities or to obtain
health care services for the person or another member of the
person’s immediate family; or
(3) To transport the person or another member of the
person’s immediate family to or from school; or
(b) An alternative means of transportation is not available to a
member of the immediate family of the person whose registration is
suspended.
Sec. 6. NRS 4.3762 is hereby amended to read as follows:
4.3762 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, in
lieu of imposing any punishment other than a minimum sentence
required by statute, a justice of the peace may sentence a person
convicted of a misdemeanor to a term of residential confinement. In
making this determination, the justice of the peace shall consider the
criminal record of the convicted person and the seriousness of the
crime committed.
2. In sentencing a convicted person to a term of residential
confinement, the justice of the peace shall:
(a) Require the convicted person to be confined to his or her
residence during the time the convicted person is away from his or
her employment, public service or other activity authorized by the
justice of the peace; and
(b) Require enhanced supervision of the convicted person,
including, without limitation, electronic surveillance and
unannounced visits to his or her residence or other locations where
the convicted person is expected to be to determine whether the
convicted person is complying with the terms of his or her sentence.
3. In sentencing a convicted person to a term of residential
confinement, the justice of the peace may, when the circumstances
warrant, require the convicted person to submit to:
(a) A search and seizure by the chief of a department of
alternative sentencing, an assistant alternative sentencing officer or
any other law enforcement officer at any time of the day or night
without a search warrant; and
(b) Periodic tests to determine whether the offender is using a
controlled substance or consuming alcohol.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an electronic
device may be used to supervise a convicted person sentenced to a
term of residential confinement. The device may be capable of using
the Global Positioning System, but must be minimally intrusive and
limited in capability to recording or transmitting information
concerning the location of the person, including, but not limited to,
the transmission of still visual images which do not concern the
activities of the person, and producing, upon request, reports or
records of the person’s presence near or within a crime scene or
-
*AB175*

– 11 –
prohibited area or his or her departure from a specified geographic
location. A device which is capable of recording or transmitting:
(a) Oral or wire communications or any auditory sound; or
(b) Information concerning the activities of the person,
 must not be used.
5. An electronic device must be used in the manner set forth in
subsection 4 to supervise a person who is sentenced pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 for a second
violation within [7] 10 years of driving under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance.
6. A term of residential confinement, together with the term of
any minimum sentence required by statute, may not exceed the
maximum sentence which otherwise could have been imposed for
the offense.
7. The justice of the peace shall not sentence a person
convicted of committing a battery which constitutes domestic
violence pursuant to NRS 33.018 to a term of residential
confinement in lieu of imprisonment unless the justice of the peace
makes a finding that the person is not likely to pose a threat to the
victim of the battery.
8. The justice of the peace may issue a warrant for the arrest of
a convicted person who violates or fails to fulfill a condition of
residential confinement.
Sec. 7. NRS 5.076 is hereby amended to read as follows:
5.076 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, in lieu
of imposing any punishment other than a minimum sentence
required by statute, a municipal judge may sentence a person
convicted of a misdemeanor to a term of residential confinement. In
making this determination, the municipal judge shall consider the
criminal record of the convicted person and the seriousness of the
crime committed.
2. In sentencing a convicted person to a term of residential
confinement, the municipal judge shall:
(a) Require the convicted person to be confined to his or her
residence during the time the convicted person is away from his or
her employment, public service or other activity authorized by the
municipal judge; and
(b) Require enhanced supervision of the convicted person,
including, without limitation, electronic surveillance and
unannounced visits to his or her residence or other locations where
the convicted person is expected to be in order to determine whether
the convicted person is complying with the terms of his or her
sentence.
-
*AB175*

– 12 –
3. In sentencing a convicted person to a term of residential
confinement, the municipal judge may, when the circumstances
warrant, require the convicted person to submit to:
(a) A search and seizure by the chief of a department of
alternative sentencing, an assistant alternative sentencing officer or
any other law enforcement officer at any time of the day or night
without a search warrant; and
(b) Periodic tests to determine whether the offender is using a
controlled substance or consuming alcohol.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, an electronic
device may be used to supervise a convicted person sentenced to a
term of residential confinement. The device may be capable of using
the Global Positioning System, but must be minimally intrusive and
limited in capability to recording or transmitting information
concerning the location of the person, including, but not limited to,
the transmission of still visual images which do not concern the
activities of the person, and producing, upon request, reports or
records of the person’s presence near or within a crime scene or
prohibited area or his or her departure from a specified geographic
location. A device which is capable of recording or transmitting:
(a) Oral or wire communications or any auditory sound; or
(b) Information concerning the activities of the person,
 must not be used.
5. An electronic device must be used in the manner set forth in
subsection 4 to supervise a person who is sentenced pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 for a second
violation within [7] 10 years of driving under the influence of
intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance.
6. A term of residential confinement, together with the term of
any minimum sentence required by statute, may not exceed the
maximum sentence which otherwise could have been imposed for
the offense.
7. The municipal judge shall not sentence a person convicted
of committing a battery which constitutes domestic violence
pursuant to NRS 33.018 to a term of residential confinement in lieu
of imprisonment unless the municipal judge makes a finding that the
person is not likely to pose a threat to the victim of the battery.
8. The municipal judge may issue a warrant for the arrest of a
convicted person who violates or fails to fulfill a condition of
residential confinement.
Sec. 8. NRS 176A.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.245 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
after a defendant is discharged from probation or a case is dismissed
pursuant to NRS 176A.240, the court shall order sealed all
documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute
-
*AB175*

– 13 –
book entries and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to
the case in the custody of such other agencies and officers as are
named in the court’s order if the defendant fulfills the terms and
conditions imposed by the court and the Division. The court shall
order those records sealed without a hearing unless the Division
petitions the court, for good cause shown, not to seal the records and
requests a hearing thereon.
2. If the defendant is charged with a violation of :
(a) NRS 200.485 [, 484C.110 or 484C.120] and the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside as
provided in NRS 176A.240, not sooner than 7 years after the
charges are conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is
set aside and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant [,] ; or
(b) NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 and the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside
as provided in NRS 176A.240, not sooner than 10 years after the
charges are conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction
is set aside and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant,
 the justice court, municipal court or district court, as applicable,
shall order that all documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s
record, minute book entries and entries on dockets, and other
documents relating to the case in the custody of such other agencies
and officers as are named in the court’s order be sealed. The justice
court, municipal court or district court, as applicable, shall order
those records sealed without a hearing unless the Division petitions
the court, for good cause shown, not to seal the records and requests
a hearing thereon.
3. If the court orders sealed the record of a defendant who is
discharged from probation, whose case is dismissed, whose charges
were conditionally dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was
set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.240, the court shall send a copy of
the order to each agency or officer named in the order. Each such
agency or officer shall notify the court in writing of its compliance
with the order.
Sec. 9. NRS 176A.265 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.265 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
after a defendant is discharged from probation or a case is dismissed
pursuant to NRS 176A.260, the district court, justice court or
municipal court, as applicable, shall order sealed all documents,
papers and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute book entries
and entries on dockets, and other documents relating to the case in
the custody of such other agencies and officers as are named in the
court’s order if the defendant fulfills the terms and conditions
imposed by the court and the Division. The district court, justice
court or municipal court, as applicable, shall order those records
-
*AB175*

– 14 –
sealed without a hearing unless the Division petitions the court, for
good cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a hearing
thereon.
2. If the defendant is charged with a violation of :
(a) NRS 200.485 [, 484C.110 or 484C.120] and the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside as
provided in NRS 176A.260, not sooner than 7 years after the
charges are conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is
set aside and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant [,] ;
(b) NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 and the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside
as provided in NRS 176A.260, not sooner than 10 years after the
charges are conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction
is set aside and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant,
 the justice court, municipal court or district court, as applicable,
shall order that all documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s
record, minute book entries and entries on dockets, and other
documents relating to the case in the custody of such other agencies
and officers as are named in the court’s order be sealed. The justice
court, municipal court or district court, as applicable, shall order
those records sealed without a hearing unless the Division petitions
the court, for good cause shown, not to seal the records and requests
a hearing thereon.
3. If the district court, justice court or municipal court, as
applicable, orders sealed the record of a defendant who is
discharged from probation, whose case is dismissed, whose charges
were conditionally dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was
set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.260, the court shall send a copy of
the order to each agency or officer named in the order. Each such
agency or officer shall notify the district court, justice court or
municipal court, as applicable, in writing of its compliance with the
order.
Sec. 10. NRS 176A.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
176A.295 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
after a defendant is discharged from probation or a case is dismissed
pursuant to NRS 176A.290, the justice court, municipal court or
district court, as applicable, shall order sealed all documents, papers
and exhibits in the defendant’s record, minute book entries and
entries on dockets, and other documents relating to the case in the
custody of such other agencies and officers as are named in the
court’s order if the defendant fulfills the terms and conditions
imposed by the court and the Division. The justice court, municipal
court or district court, as applicable, shall order those records sealed
without a hearing unless the Division petitions the court, for good
cause shown, not to seal the records and requests a hearing thereon.
-
*AB175*

– 15 –
2. If the defendant is charged with a violation of :
(a) NRS 200.485 [, 484C.110 or 484C.120] and the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside as
provided in NRS 176A.290, not sooner than 7 years after the
charges are conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is
set aside and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant [,] ; or
(b) NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 and the charges are
conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction is set aside
as provided in NRS 176A.260, not sooner than 10 years after the
charges are conditionally dismissed or the judgment of conviction
is set aside and upon the filing of a petition by the defendant,
 the justice court, municipal court or district court, as applicable,
shall order that all documents, papers and exhibits in the defendant’s
record, minute book entries and entries on dockets, and other
documents relating to the case in the custody of such other agencies
and officers as are named in the court’s order be sealed. The justice
court, municipal court or district court, as applicable, shall order
those records sealed without a hearing unless the Division petitions
the court, for good cause shown, not to seal the records and requests
a hearing thereon.
3. If the justice court, municipal court or district court, as
applicable, orders sealed the record of a defendant who is
discharged from probation, whose case is dismissed, whose charges
were conditionally dismissed or whose judgment of conviction was
set aside pursuant to NRS 176A.290, the court shall send a copy of
the order to each agency or officer named in the order. Each such
agency or officer shall notify the justice court, municipal court or
district court, as applicable, in writing of its compliance with the
order.
Sec. 11. NRS 179.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.245 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and
NRS 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295, 179.247, 179.259,
201.354 and 453.3365, a person may petition the court in which the
person was convicted for the sealing of all records relating to a
conviction of:
(a) A category A felony, a crime of violence or residential
burglary pursuant to NRS 205.060 after 10 years from the date of
release from actual custody or discharge from parole or probation,
whichever occurs later;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (e), a
category B, C or D felony after 5 years from the date of release from
actual custody or discharge from parole or probation, whichever
occurs later;
-
*AB175*

– 16 –
(c) A category E felony after 2 years from the date of release
from actual custody or discharge from parole or probation,
whichever occurs later;
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), any gross
misdemeanor after 2 years from the date of release from actual
custody or discharge from probation, whichever occurs later;
(e) A violation of NRS 422.540 to 422.570, inclusive, [a
violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 other than a felony,] or a
battery which constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018
other than a felony, after 7 years from the date of release from actual
custody or from the date when the person is no longer under a
suspended sentence, whichever occurs later;
(f) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 other than a
felony, after 10 years from the date of release from actual custody
or from the date when the person is no longer under a suspended
sentence, whichever occurs later;
(g) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), if the offense
is punished as a misdemeanor, a battery pursuant to NRS 200.481,
harassment pursuant to NRS 200.571, stalking pursuant to NRS
200.575 or a violation of a temporary or extended order for
protection, after 2 years from the date of release from actual custody
or from the date when the person is no longer under a suspended
sentence, whichever occurs later; or
[(g)] (h) Any other misdemeanor after 1 year from the date of
release from actual custody or from the date when the person is no
longer under a suspended sentence, whichever occurs later.
2. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be accompanied by the petitioner’s current, verified records
received from the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History;
(b) If the petition references NRS 453.3365, include a certificate
of acknowledgment or the disposition of the proceedings for the
records to be sealed from all agencies of criminal justice which
maintain such records;
(c) Include a list of any other public or private agency, company,
official or other custodian of records that is reasonably known to the
petitioner to have possession of records of the conviction and to
whom the order to seal records, if issued, will be directed;
(d) Include information that, to the best knowledge and belief of
the petitioner, accurately and completely identifies the records to be
sealed, including, without limitation, the:
(1) Date of birth of the petitioner;
(2) Specific conviction to which the records to be sealed
pertain; and
-
*AB175*

– 17 –
(3) Date of arrest relating to the specific conviction to which
the records to be sealed pertain; and
(e) If applicable, include a statement from the petitioner
certifying that at the time the crime for which the records to be
sealed was committed, the petitioner was being sex trafficked
pursuant to NRS 201.300.
3. Upon receiving a petition pursuant to this section, the court
shall notify the law enforcement agency that arrested the petitioner
for the crime and the prosecuting attorney, including, without
limitation, the Attorney General, who prosecuted the petitioner for
the crime. The prosecuting attorney and any person having relevant
evidence may testify and present evidence at any hearing on the
petition.
4. If the prosecuting agency that prosecuted the petitioner for
the crime stipulates to the sealing of the records, the court shall
apply the presumption set forth in NRS 179.2445 and seal the
records. If the prosecuting agency does not stipulate to the sealing of
the records or does not file a written objection within 30 days after
receiving notification pursuant to subsection 3 and the court makes
the findings set forth in subsection 5, the court may order the sealing
of the records in accordance with subsection 5 without a hearing. If
the court does not order the sealing of the records or the prosecuting
agency files a written objection, a hearing on the petition must be
conducted. At the hearing, unless an objecting party presents
evidence sufficient to rebut the presumption set forth in NRS
179.2445, the court shall apply the presumption and seal the records.
5. If the court finds that, in the period prescribed in subsection
1, the petitioner has not been charged with any offense for which the
charges are pending or convicted of any offense, except for minor
moving or standing traffic violations, the court may order sealed all
records of the conviction which are in the custody of any agency of
criminal justice or any public or private agency, company, official
or other custodian of records in the State of Nevada, and may also
order all such records of the petitioner returned to the file of the
court where the proceeding was commenced from, including,
without limitation, the Federal Bureau of Investigation and all other
agencies of criminal justice which maintain such records and which
are reasonably known by either the petitioner or the court to have
possession of such records.
6. A person may not petition the court to seal records relating
to a conviction of:
(a) A crime against a child;
(b) A sexual offense;
(c) Invasion of the home with a deadly weapon pursuant to
NRS 205.067;
-
*AB175*

– 18 –
(d) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable
as a felony pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 484C.400;
(e) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
(f) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130 or 484C.430;
(g) A violation of NRS 488.410 that is punishable as a felony
pursuant to NRS 488.427; or
(h) A violation of NRS 488.420 or 488.425.
7. The provisions of paragraph (e) of subsection 1 and
paragraph (d) of subsection 6 must not be construed to preclude a
person from being able to petition the court to seal records relating
to a conviction for a violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120
pursuant to this section if the person was found guilty of a violation
of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable pursuant to:
(a) Paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400; or
(b) Paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 but had a
judgment of conviction entered against him or her for a violation of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 because the person
participated in the statewide sobriety and drug monitoring program
established pursuant to NRS 484C.392.
8. If the court grants a petition for the sealing of records
pursuant to this section, upon the request of the person whose
records are sealed, the court may order sealed all records of the civil
proceeding in which the records were sealed.
9. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no fee may be
charged by any court or agency of criminal justice in this State
related to a petition for the sealing of records pursuant to this section
if, at the time the crime for which the records to be sealed was
committed, the petitioner was being sex trafficked pursuant to NRS
201.300. As used in this subsection, “fee” includes, without
limitation, any fee to file a petition, obtain fingerprints if provided
by a governmental agency of this State, obtain any records of
criminal history, obtain records of past arrests and convictions or
obtain or certify copies of documents pursuant to NRS 19.013 and
any other fee related to the sealing of records pursuant to this
section.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Crime against a child” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179D.0357.
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) Murder of the first degree committed in the perpetration
or attempted perpetration of sexual assault or of sexual abuse or
-
*AB175*

– 19 –
sexual molestation of a child less than 14 years of age pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.030.
(2) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
(3) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368, if
punishable as a felony.
(4) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400.
(5) An offense involving the administration of a drug to
another person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of
a felony pursuant to NRS 200.405, if the felony is an offense listed
in this paragraph.
(6) An offense involving the administration of a controlled
substance to another person with the intent to enable or assist the
commission of a crime of violence, if the crime of violence is an
offense listed in this paragraph.
(7) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation.
(8) An offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant
to NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive.
(9) Fertility fraud pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
of NRS 200.975.
(10) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180.
(11) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210, if
punishable as a felony.
(12) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220,
if punishable as a felony.
(13) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230.
(14) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450.
(15) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school
or volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
(16) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college
or university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
(17) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant
to NRS 201.560, if punishable as a felony.
(18) An attempt to commit an offense listed in this
paragraph.
Sec. 12. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to
offenses committed before July 1, 2026, for the purpose of
determining which penalties a person is subject to under NRS
484C.400, as amended by section 2 of this act, for an offense
committed on or after July 1, 2025.
Sec. 13. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB175*